Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-702 Group purchasing. A credit
union may enter into marketing arrangements and joint ventures with other
credit unions, or organizations or financial institutions to facilitate its
members' voluntary purchase of goods, insurance and other services from third
parties, consistent with the purposes of the credit union. A credit union may
be compensated for services so provided. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next